Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4116
Dry Pea and Lentil Fund, created; use; investment.

The Dry Pea and Lentil Fund is created. All taxes collected by the commission pursuant to the Dry Pea and Lentil Resources Act and any repayments relating to the fund, including license fees or royalties, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be used to carry out such act. The commission shall at each regular meeting review and approve all expenditures made since its last regular meeting. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.